District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.09

Remote participation in annual and special meetings.

(a)

Shareholders of any class or series may participate in any meeting of shareholders by means of remote communication to the extent the board of directors authorizes such participation for such class or series. Participation by means of remote communication shall be subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors adopts, and shall be in conformity with subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

Shareholders participating in a shareholders’ meeting by means of remote communication shall be deemed present and may vote at such a meeting if the corporation has implemented reasonable measures:

(1)

To verify that each person participating remotely is a shareholder; and

(2)

To provide such shareholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote, including the opportunity to communicate with other shareholders participating in the meeting and to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting as the meeting is taking place.

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(10), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-305.05, § 29-910, § 29-911, and § 29-912.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.